Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Suitable Home Law

205.410.
Declaration of purpose — Short title. [Repealed.]

205.420.
Suitability of home — Evaluation. [Repealed.]

205.430.
Home condition improvement — Action of department or department of child welfare. [Repealed.]

205.440.
Unsuitable home evidence — Hearing — Order. [Repealed.]

205.450.
Continuation of assistance. [Repealed.]